tutorial-env/lib/python3.6/site-packages/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_ro_RO.dic
u2t3d
u2t3f4
u2t1g2
u2t1h
u2t1j
u2t1k
u2t3m
u2t1n
u2t1p2
u2t1q
u4t3s2
u2t2ș
u2t3t2
u2t1ț
u2t1v
u2t1w
u2t1x
u4t3z
u2ț1b
u2ț1c
u2ț1d
u2ț1f4
u2ț1g2
u2ț1h
u2ț1j
u2ț1k
u2ț1l
u2ț1m
u2ț1n
u2ț1p2
u2ț1q
u2ț1r
u2ț1s
u2ț2ș
u2ț1t2
u2ț1ț
u2ț1v
u2ț1w
u2ț1x
u2ț1z
u2v1b
u2v1c
u2v1d
u2v1f4
u2v1g2
u2v1h
u2v1j
u2v1k
u2v1m
u2v1n
u2v1p2
u2v1q
u2v1s
u2v2ș
u2v1t2
u2v1ț
u2v1v
u2v1w
u2v1x
u2v1z
u2w1b
u2w1c
u2w1d
u2w1f4
u2w1g2
u2w1h
u2w1j
u2w1k
u2w1l
u2w1m
u2w1n
u2w1p2
u2w1q
u2w1r
u2w1s
u2w2ș
u2w1t2
u2w1ț
u2w1v
u2w1w
u2w1x
u2w1z
u2x1b
u2x1c
u2x1d
u2x1f4
u2x1g2
u2x1h
u2x1j
u2x1k
u2x1l
u2x1m
u2x1n
u2x1p2
u2x1q
u2x1r
u2x1s
u2x2ș
u2x1t2
u2x1ț
u2x1v
u2x1w
u2x1x
u2x1z
u2z1b
u2z1c
u2z1d
u2z1f4
u2z2g2
u2z1h
u2z1j
u2z1k
u2z1l
u2z4m
u2z1n
u2z1p2
u2z1q
u2z1r
u2z1s
u2z2ș
u2z1t2
u2z1ț
u2z2v
u2z1w
u2z1x
u2z1z
y2b1b
y2b1c
y2b1d
y2b1f4
y2b1g2
y2b1h
y2b1j
y2b1k
y2b1m
y2b1n
y2b1p2
y2b1q
y2b1s
y2b2ș
y2b1t2
y2b1ț
y2b1v
y2b1w
y2b1x
y2b1z
y2c1b
y2c1c
y2c1d
y2c1f4
y2c1g2
y2c1j
y2c1k
y2c1m
y2c5n
y2c1p2
y2c1q
y2c1s
y2c2ș
y2c1t2
y2c1ț
y2c1v
y2c1w
y2c1x
y2c1z
y2d1b
y2d1c
y2d1d
y2d1f4
y2d1g2
y2d1h
y2d1j
y2d1k
y2d1m
y2d1n
y2d1p2
y2d1q
y2d1s
y2d2ș
y2d1t2
y2d1ț
y2d1v
y2d1w
y2d1x
y2d1z
y2f1b
y2f1c
y2f1d
y2f4f4
y2f1g2
y2f1h
y2f1j
y2f1k
y2f1m
y2f1n
y2f1p2
y2f1q
y2f1s
y2f2ș
y2f1t2
y2f1ț
y2f1v
y2f1w
y2f1x
y2f1z
y2g1b
y2g1c
y2g1d
y2g1f4
y2g2g2
y2g1j
y2g1k
y2g3m
y2g3n
y2g1p2
y2g1q
y2g1s
y2g2ș
y2g1t2
y2g1ț
y2g3v
y2g1w
y2g1x
y2g1z
y2h1b
y2h1c
y2h1d
y2h1f4
y2h1g2
y2h1h
y2h1j
y2h1k
y2h1m
y2h1n
y2h1p2
y2h1q
y2h1s
y2h2ș
y2h1t2
y2h1ț
y2h1v
y2h1w
y2h1x
y2h1z
y2j1b
y2j1c
y2j1d
y2j1f4
y2j1g2
y2j1h
y2j1j
y2j1k
y2j1l
y2j1m
y2j1n
y2j1p2
y2j1q
y2j1r
y2j1s
y2j2ș
y2j1t2
y2j1ț
y2j1v
y2j1w
y2j1x
y2j1z
y2k1b
y2k1c
y2k1d
y2k1f4
y2k1g2
y2k1h
y2k1j
y2k1k
y2k1l
y2k1m
y2k1n
y2k1p2
y2k1q
y2k1r
y2k1s
y2k2ș
y2k1t2
y2k1ț
y2k1v
y2k1w
y2k1x
y2k1z
y2l1b
y2l1c
y2l1d
y2l1f4
y2l1g2
y2l1h
y2l1j
y2l1k
y2l1l
y2l1m
y2l5n
y2l1p2
y2l1q
y2l1r
y2l1s
y2l3ș
y2l1t2
y2l1ț
y2l1v
y2l1w
y2l1x
y2l1z
y2m1b
y2m1c
y2m1d
y2m1f4
y2m1g2
y2m1h
y2m1j
y2m1k
y2m1l
y2m1m
y2m1n
y2m1p2
y2m1q
y2m1r
y2m3s2
y2m2ș
y2m1t2
y2m1ț
y2m1v
y2m1w
y2m1x
y2m1z
y2n1b
y2n1c
y2n1d
y2n1f4
y2n1g2
y2n1h
y2n3j
y2n1k
y2n1l
y2n1m
y2n1n
y2n1p2
y2n1q
y2n1r
y2n3s2
y2n3ș2
y2n1t2
y2n1ț
y2n1v
y2n1w
y2n1x
y2n1z
y2p1b
y2p3c
y2p1d
y2p1f4
y2p1g2
y2p1h
y2p1j
y2p1k
y2p1m
y2p1n
y2p2p2
y2p1q
y2p3s
y2p3ș
y2p3t2
y2p3ț
y2p1v
y2p1w
y2p1x
y2p1z
y2q1b
y2q1c
y2q1d
y2q1f4
y2q1g2
y2q1h
y2q1j
y2q1k
y2q1l
y2q1m
y2q1n
y2q1p2
y2q1q
y2q1r
y2q1s
y2q2ș
y2q1t2
y2q1ț
y2q1v
y2q1w
y2q1x
y2q1z
y2r1b
y2r1c
y2r1d
y2r1f4
y2r1g2
y2r1h
y2r1j
y2r1k
y2r1l
y2r1m
y2r1n
y2r1p2
y2r1q
y2r1r
y2r1s2
y2r3ș
y2r1t2
y2r1ț
y2r1v
y2r1w
y2r1x
y2r1z
y2s1b
y2s1c
y2s1d
y4s2f4
y2s1g2
y2s1h
y2s1j
y2s1k
y3s4l
y4s1m
y2s1n
y2s1p2
y2s1q
y2s1r
y2s1s
y2s2ș
y2s1t2
y2s1ț
y2s1v
y2s1w
y2s1x
y2s1z
y2ș1b
y2ș1c
y2ș1d
y2ș1f4
y2ș1g2
y2ș1h
y2ș1j
y2ș1k
y2ș1l
y2ș1m
y4ș5n
y2ș2p2
y2ș1q
y2ș1r
y2ș1s
y2ș2ș
y2ș1t2
y2ș1ț
y2ș1v
y2ș1w
y2ș1x
y2ș1z
y2t1b
y2t3c
y2t3d
y2t3f4
y2t1g2
y2t1h
y2t1j
y2t1k
y2t3m
y2t1n
y2t1p2
y2t1q
y4t3s2
y2t2ș
y2t3t2
y2t1ț
y2t1v
y2t1w
y2t1x
y4t3z
y2ț1b
y2ț1c
y2ț1d
y2ț1f4
y2ț1g2
y2ț1h
y2ț1j
y2ț1k
y2ț1l
y2ț1m
y2ț1n
y2ț1p2
y2ț1q
y2ț1r
y2ț1s
y2ț2ș
y2ț1t2
y2ț1ț
y2ț1v
y2ț1w
y2ț1x
y2ț1z
y2v1b
y2v1c
y2v1d
y2v1f4
y2v1g2
y2v1h
y2v1j
y2v1k
y2v1m
y2v1n
y2v1p2
y2v1q
y2v1s
y2v2ș
y2v1t2
y2v1ț
y2v1v
y2v1w
y2v1x
y2v1z
y2w1b
y2w1c
y2w1d
y2w1f4
y2w1g2
y2w1h
y2w1j
y2w1k
y2w1l
y2w1m
y2w1n
y2w1p2
y2w1q
y2w1r
y2w1s
y2w2ș
y2w1t2
y2w1ț
y2w1v
y2w1w
y2w1x
y2w1z
y2x1b
y2x1c
y2x1d
y2x1f4
y2x1g2
y2x1h
y2x1j
y2x1k
y2x1l
y2x1m
y2x1n
y2x1p2
y2x1q
y2x1r
y2x1s
y2x2ș
y2x1t2
y2x1ț
y2x1v
y2x1w
y2x1x
y2x1z
y2z1b
y2z1c
y2z1d
y2z1f4
y2z2g2
y2z1h
y2z1j
y2z1k
y2z1l
y2z4m
y2z1n
y2z1p2
y2z1q
y2z1r
y2z1s
y2z2ș
y2z1t2
y2z1ț
y2z2v
y2z1w
y2z1x
y2z1z
.a3i1c
.a2i1
.a4n3i2s
.a3n2i1
.a2z
.cr2e1
.1c
.de2a1j
.d2e2z1
.1g4
.i2a1
.2i1
.i2e
.i3ț
.i4u3
.i3v
.î4m
.î2
.n2
.3n2i2
.1p4
.pr2e3ș
.pr2e
.1s4
.2ș4
.u4i1
.2u1
.u5n2i1
.u1n
.1z2
2ac2ă1
ach2i5
a3fo3
a3i2a1
a2i1
a3i2e
a3i1l
ai3s2
a3i2u1
ali3e6
al2i1
2a4n.
a5n2e
ani2e
a3n2i1
ani3ș4
2a5n2u1
ao2g2
a1ti4a1
at2i1
2atr
a5t4u1
2a3ța1
2a3ț2ă1
2a2u1
a3ua1
a3u1d
a3u1g2
a3u2l
a3u1n
a3u1r
a3u2s
a3ute
au1t2
a3u2ț
a3u1z
ăi2e
ă5n2u3
ărg2i5
ă4t4i.
ăt2i1
ăti4e
ă3u1
ă2z2i1
1b
2b.
ba2ț
ba1
bă5n2u5
b2ă1
bă1n
2b1c
2b1d
bi2a.
b2i1
bia1
bi2a1t2
bi2e
3b2i2i1
b2l
3b4li1m
bl2i1
b4l2u1
bo1
bo3ri1c
bo1r
bo1r2i1
2b1s
2b1t2
2b1ț
bți4ne.
bț2i1
bți2n
bți3ne
b2u3
4c.
ca3u1t2
ca1
c2a2u1
1că2c
c2ă1
căt2u5
că1t2
2c1c
ce2a1
c2e2ț
2c2h4i.
ch2i1
ci3ale
cia1
cia1l
ci2o
ci2s2
c4i3s1p2
ciza2
ci1z
c4l
2c1m
2c5n
copia2t2ă1
co1p2
cop2i1
copia1
copia1t2
co2ț
2c1s
2c1t2
2c1ț
cu3i1m
c2u1
cu2i1
3cu2l
cu2ț
2c1v
1d
4d.
da4m
da1
da2ț
2d1c
de4s1c
d2e2s
dez3i2n
d2e1z
dez2i1
di2a2n
d2i1
dia1
dia2t2ă1
dia1t2
2d1j
2d1m
2d1n
do4i1l
do3i2
3d2u1
e1a1c
e1a1j
e1a1l
e1a2ș
e1a1t2
ea2ț
e1a1v
ebu5i1
eb2u3
eci2a1
ec2i1
ecla2r2e
ec4l
ecla1
ecla1r
edi4u3l2u1
ed2i1
edi2u1
edi3u2l
ee2a1
1e3fa1
e3i2a1
e2i1
e3i2e
e3i2i1
e3i1l
e3i1m
e3i2n
e3i2o
e3i3s2
e3i1t2
e3i4u1
e1î2
em2on5
e3mo
e5ne
e3on
2era1
2er2ă1
e3s3co
es5t2i1
e3ș2i1
eta2n4ț
eta1
eta2n
e3u1
eu5ș
1evi1t2
ev2i1
ez2ă5
ezi3a1
ez2i1
e2z1o
1f4
2f.
3fa1
3fă3ș
f2ă1
2f4i.
f2i1
fi3e
3fo
2f1t2
f5t2u1
1g2
2g.
gă3ț
g2ă1
2g2h4i.
gh2i1
2g4i.
g2i1
g4l
2g3m
2g3n
g2o5n
3g2u3
2g3v
2h.
2h4i.
h2i1
hi2a1
hi3c
hi4u1
2h1n
4i.
3i2a1c
ia1
ia3g4
2i2a2i1
i2a2ș
ia2ț
i3c2ă1
i2e1d
i3ia1
i3i1e
2i3i2i1
i3i1l
i3i2n
i3i1r
i3i1t2
iitu2r2ă1
iit2u1
iitu1r
i2î2
4ila1
i3le
i3lo
2i1mater2i6
i3ma1
ima1t2
imate1r
i4n1e1d
i3ne
in2g2ă1
2i1n3ț2i4i1
inț2i1
i3o1d
2i3o3n2i1
i2on
io2ț
ip2ă5
2i5t2i1
i3ți2a1
2i1ț2i1
i3ți2o
i3ua1
i3u2l
i3u1m
i3u2n1d
iu1n
i3u5n2u1
i3u2s
i3u1t2
î3e
î3lo
î3na3
î3r2i1
î3rî2
î4t2i1
î4ț2i1
î5ț2i2i1
1j
2j.
2j1d
2j4i.
j2i1
ji2ț
2j1l
j4u1
ju3t2
1k
4l.
laraț2i2
la1
la1r
lara1
lara1ț
lă2t2i1
l2ă1
lă1t2
lăt2u5
2l1b
2l1c
2l1d
le2a1
2l1f4
2l1g2
4l4i.
l2i1
li3a1
li3e
li3o
2l1m
2l5n
2l1s
2l3ș
2l1t2
2l1ț
3l2u1
2l1v
2m.
3ma1
3m2ă1
2m1b
mblî1n3
mb2l
mblî2
3me
m2e2z
2m1f4
3m2i1
4m4i.
mi2ț
3mî2
2m1n
3mo
m2on4
2m3s2
2m1t2
2m1ț
3m2u1
mu2ț
2m1v
4n.
3na1
4n1a1d
na3i2n
na2i1
3n2ă1
n2ci2s2
nc2i1
n2ci1z
ne1a1b
ne1a2n
ne1a1p2
4ne1f4
4n1e1g2
n2e3s2
4nev2i1
ne1v
4n1e2x
2n1g2
ng3ă1t2
ng2ă1
ni3e1z
ni1e
3nî2
n3j
n1n
3no
no4ș
n1r
2n3s2
n4s3f4
n4sî2
ns3po
n2s1p2
n3ș2
n4ș2i1
2n1t2
n5t2i1
n5t4u1
2n1ț
5n2u1
nu3a1
nu3ă3
nu5m
nu3s2
2n1z
o1a1g2
oa1
o2a1l
o2b4i.
ob2i1
2oca1
ocu5i1
oc2u1
odi2a1
od2i1
o3i2
o2i1ect2i2
oi1e
oi2e1c
oie2c1t2
o4i3s2p2
oi2s
omedi2e.
o3me
ome1d
omed2i1
omedi1e
o1o
opi3e
op2i1
opla2
op4l
oplag2i2
opla1g2
o1ra1
o1r2ă1
o1r2e
o1r2i1
o2ri1c
o1rî2
o1ro
or2te.
o1r2u1
os5t2i1
o3ș2i1
otaț2i4
ota1
ota1ț
o5t2i1
ot3o1d
1p2
2p.
3pa1
pă2r3ț
p2ă1
pă1r
2p3c
pecț2i2
p2e1c
pe2c1ț
p2e2ț
2p4i.
p2i1
pi2e
pi3e.
pi3e1z
pi3o
pi2ț
pi2z
p4l
po4ș
po2ț
2p3s
2p3ș
2p3t2
2p3ț
p4ț4i.
pț2i1
pu3b4
p2u1
puri2e
pu1r
pur2i1
pu4ș
4r.
2r1b
2r1d
r2e
re2b2i1
re1b
rec2i1z2i2
r2e1c
rec2i1
reci1z
re3s2cr
r2e2s
re2s1c
re4ș2i1
r2e2ș
2r1f4
2r1g2
2r1h
ri3a1
r2i4al2i1
ria1l
ri3e1ț
ri1e
ri3e1z
r2i5m2i1
ri1m
2ri3u1n
ri2u1
ri3v
2r1k
2r1l
2r1m
2r1n
rna2ț
r3na1
rograf2i6
ro1g2
rogra1
rogra1f4
2r1p2
2r1r
r3s1p2
2r3ș
rtua2le
rtu3a1
rt2u1
rtua1l
2r1ț
ru3i1l
r2u1
ru2i1
ru3s1p2
ru2s
2r1v
2r1z
4s.
5sa1
5s2ă1
să4m2
să4ș
2s1c
4s4c.
3s2co
3se
se2a1
se4e.
se3e
1s2e2s2
se3s1p2
s2e4ș
4s2f4
5sfî2
3s2i1
si3p2
3sî2
3s4l
4s1m
s1n
3so
so3ri1c
so1r
so1r2i1
2s1p2
sto3
5s2u1
su2ț
2ș
4ș.
3șa1
șa2ț
3ș2ă2
3șe
1ș2i1
4ș4i.
5ș2i2i1
5și1l
3și2n
3șî2
4ș5n
ș5n2u5
3șo
ș2p2
ș2t2i1
ș1t2
4ș4t4i.
4ș3tr
3ș2u1
1t2
4t.
1t2a3u1t2
ta1
t2a2u1
2t3c
2t3d
te2a1
te5n2i1
t2en
teri6al2ă1
te1r
teri3a1
ter2i1
teria1l
te3s2p2
t2e2s
2t3f4
4t4i.
t2i1
ti3a1
ti3e
3ti4i.
t2i2i1
3ti1l
3ti2n
ti2ț
2tî.
tî2
t4l
2t3m
3to1l
3to1r
to2to
1t2o1t2
3tr6u.
tr2u1
3tru2l
3tru1o
4t3s2
2t3t2
tu3a1
t2u1
tu3i1m
tu2i1
4t3u1n
tu4ș
4t3z
2ț.
3ța1
3ț2ă1
1ț2e2ț
3ția1
ți3a.
3ți1e
3ț2i2i1
3ți1l
1ți2ț
3ți2u1
ț2u3
țu5i1
6u.
u2a.
ua1
u2a1d
2u3a2u1
u2ă3
uă1s2
u2bia1
ub2i1
u2b3l
u2b1o1
u3e
4u3g2u3
u3i2a1
u3i2e
u3i2n
u3i1r
u3i2s
u3i1t2
u3i2ț
u3i1z
u3la1
u3l2ă1
u3le
u3l2i2i1
ul2i1
u3lî2
u3lo
umi5r
u3m2i1
us2pr
u2to
3u3to1r
u3u2i1
2u2u1
u3u1m
2v.
v2e2ț
v2e2z
2v4i.
v2i1
vi2ț
2v1n
vorbito2
vo1r
vo2r1b
vorb2i1
vorbi1t2
3vr
1x
2x.
3xa1
3x2ă1
3xe
x2e2z
3x2i1
3xo
3x2u1
1z
2z.
za2ț
za1
2z1b
2z2g2
2z4i.
z2i1
zi2a2n
zia1
zi2a1r
3z2i2i1
3zi1l
z4m
2z1n
3z2o1l
3z2on
zu2ț
z2u1
2z2v
z3v2ă1
